Utah statutes.
58-37f-202.   Duties of board in relation to the database.

The board shall advise the division regarding:

(1)  establishing, maintaining, and operating the database;

(2)  access to the database and how access is obtained; and

(3)  control of information contained in the database.



Enacted by Chapter 287, 2010 General Session

